District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0798.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF IBE DISTRICT OF CO·LUMBIA. 'fhat.1his
24 act may be cited as the ••Health-Cai:,e·D ecisi,oms AnnmdmemAcl of2026".
25 Sec. 2. Cliiiapter 22 of Title 21 of the Dimict of Columbia Official Code iis Blended as
26
27 (a) Section 21-2221.01 iis amended as follm~is:
2& (1) Paragr.aph (4) is amended by slrikmg the phrase "a licensed physician or
29 advmced practice nurse" and inserting the pm.ase '"a licensed p]ly,siician. advanced practice JDine,
30 nmuropathic physician, or physician assimmt .aeitiing under a valid delegation agm;eemmt" in ~ts
31
32 (2) Paragr,aph (11) iis amended by striling the·p hrase ••or profes:sional cowiselors,"
33 and :inserti.l!lg the phrase "professional omms.elors, mr·m aturopathic physicians," m.i ts p.J.ace.
34 (3) A new paragraph (14A) is added m ·read as follo~rs:

35 “(14A) “Medically fragile” means a clinical status, as determined by an
36 authorized healthcare professional in their clinical judgment, in which an individual’s health
37 condition is characterized by one or more of the following:
38 “(A) A serious or life-limiting illness, including advanced malignancy,
39 end-stage cardiac, pulmonary, renal, or hepatic disease, advanced neurological disease, or
40 advanced dementia;
41 “(B) Advanced frailty, evidenced by significant functional decline,
42 dependence in 2 or more activities of daily living, unintentional weight loss, exhaustion,
43 decreased physical activity, or diminished physiologic reserve;
44 “(C) A serious or complex chronic medical condition that substantially
45 impairs the person’s functioning or requires ongoing medical management and for which a life-
46 threatening complication is reasonably foreseeable; or.
47 “(D) A progressive degenerative condition with an uncertain but
48 potentially limited prognosis.”
49 (4) Paragraph (15) is amended to read as follows:
50 “(15) “Patient” means a person who is medically fragile, as documented in the
51 person’s medical records, or whose medical condition and goals of care are otherwise such that
52 an authorized healthcare professional and the person or person’s authorized representative agree
53 that documenting the person’s treatment preferences on a MOST Form is appropriate, as
54 documented in the person’s medical records.”.
55 (b) Section 21-2221.03 is amended to read as follows:
56 “§ 21-2221.03. MOST Advisory Committee.

57 “DOH may establish a MOST Advisory Committee, comprised of such healthcare
58 providers, experts, and stakeholders as the DOH Director may designate, to:
59 “(1) Assist DOH in the periodic review of the paper and electronic MOST Form;
60 “(2) Promote public awareness about the option to complete a MOST Form;
61 “(3) Provide recommendations to DOH for ongoing training of healthcare
62 professionals about best practices regarding the use of a MOST Form and the nature and
63 development of related medical protocols; and
64 “(4) Support any other task related to the MOST Form that is assigned by the
65 Director of DOH.”.
66 (c) Section 21-2221.04(a) is amended as follows:
67 (1) The lead-in text is amended by striking the phrase “regarding the patient’s care
68 and medical condition:” and inserting a colon in its place.
69 (2) Paragraph (1) is amended by:
70 (A) Striking the word “intervention” and inserting the phrase “intervention
71 to a patient” in its place; and
72 (B) Striking the phrase “of a patient” and inserting the phrase “of the
73 patient” in its place.
74 (d) Section 21-2221.04(c) is amended as follows:
75 “(a) The executed MOST Form shall be uploaded into the patient’s electronic medical
76 record and submitted to the District’s health information exchange, as designated by the
77 Department of Health Care Finance, and shall become a part of the patient’s permanent medical
78 record until revoked by the patient or their authorized representative.

79 (b) A copy of the executed MOST Form shall be kept in a prominent manner in a patient's
80 printed medical records in a health care institution or private medical practice, and a copy shall
81 be transferred with the patient whenever the patient is transferred to another health care
82 institution or private medical practice, or to the patient's residence.”.
83 (e) Section 21-2221.05 is amended as follows:
84 (1) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
85 “(a) A patient or, if applicable, a patient’s authorized representative, shall be given the
86 opportunity to have a health care professional prepare a MOST form for the patient and for the
87 patient or authorized representative to execute the MOST Form, but no patient or authorized
88 representative shall be required to have a MOST form prepared for the patient nor shall a patient
89 or authorized representative be required to execute a MOST Form.
90 (2) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
91 (A) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “an authorized health
92 care professional” and inserting the phrase “a health care professional” in its place.
93 (B) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “an authorized health
94 care professional” and inserting the phrase “a health care professional” in its place.
95 (3) Subsection (c) is amended as follows:
96 (A) Paragraph (1) is amended as follows:
97 (i) Subparagraph (A) is amended by striking the phrase “; or” and
98 inserting a semicolon in its place
99 (ii) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the period and
100 inserting the phrase “; or” in its place.
101 (ii) A new subparagraph (C) is added to read as follows:

102 “(C) An authorized health care professional, after reviewing it with the
103 patient or their authorized representative.
104 (B) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “signature.” and
105 inserting the phrase “signature and the signature of an authorized health care professional.” in its
106 place.
107 (B) A new paragraph (3) is added to read as follows:
108 “(3) To be considered valid and effective, a MOST Form must be signed by both:
109 “(A) The patient or the patient’s authorized representative; and
110 “(B) An authorized health care professional.”.
111 (f) Section 21-2221.06(a)(2) is amended by striking the phrase “intent to revoke” and
112 inserting the phrase “revocation of” in its place.
113 (g) Section 21-2221.14a is repealed.
114 (h) Section 21-2221.15 is amended by striking the word “shall” and inserting the word
115 “may” in its place.
116 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
117 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
118 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
119 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301-47a).
120 Sec. 4 Effective date.
121 This act shall take effect following approval of the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
122 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of Congressional review as
123 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December

124 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206-02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
125 Columbia Register.

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL
ATTORNEY GENERAL ATTORNEY-CLIENT COMMUNICATION
LEGAL COUNSEL DIVISION
MEMORANDUM
TO: Tomás Talamante
Director
Office of Policy and Legislative Affairs
FROM: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: March 26, 2026
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Review of Draft Bill, the “Health-Care Decisions Amendment Act
of 2026” (AE-26-216)
_____________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify that
the Office of the Attorney General has reviewed the
above-referenced legislation and found it to be legally sufficient. If you have any questions in this
regard, please do not hesitate to call me at (202) 262-6402.
_________________________________
Adele El-Khouri
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, N.W., Suite 409, Washington, D.C. 20004
Phone (202) 262-6402 Email: adele.el-khouri@dc.gov

Government of the District of Columbia
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
MEMORANDUM
TO: The Honorable Phil Mendelson
Chairman, Council of the District of Columbia
FROM: Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
DATE: April 13, 2026
SUBJECT: Fiscal Impact Statement – Health-Care Decisions Amendment Act of
2026
REFERENCE: Draft Introduction as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on
March 13, 2026
Conclusion
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2026 budget and proposed fiscal year 2027 through fiscal year
2030 budget and financial plan to implement the bill.
Background
The Medical Orders for Scope of Treatment (MOST) program, administered by the Department of
Health (DC Health), allows terminally ill patients to make decisions about their end-of-life care
options in consultation with a District-licensed physician or advanced practice registered nurse.
Patients complete a paper or electronic MOST Form that specifies their preferences for
cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR), medical interventions/treatment options, antibiotics, and
medically-assisted nutrition.
The bill makes several changes1 to how the MOST Form is completed and executed, including:
• Allowing naturopathic physicians and physician assistants acting under a valid delegation
agreement to assist in the process for completing, executing, and complying with a MOST
Form;
1 By amending Chapter 22 of Title 21 of the District of Columbia Official Code.
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 203, Washington, DC 20004 (202)727-2476
www.cfo.dc.gov

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Health-Care Decisions Amendment Act of 2026,” Draft Introduction as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on
March 13, 2026.
• Clarifying who can complete a MOST Form by eliminating the requirement that a person have
a life expectancy of twelve months or less;
• Changes the composition and duties of the MOST Advisory Committee; and
• Requires that MOST Forms be included in a patient’s permanent electronic medical record.
Financial Plan Impact
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2026 budget and proposed fiscal year 2027 through fiscal year
2030 budget and financial plan to implement the bill. Expanding who can complete and execute a
MOST Form, changing the composition and duties of the MOST Advisory Committee, and requiring
that MOST Forms be included in a patient’s electronic medical record do not have a cost. DC Health
can implement the bill with existing resources.
Page 2 of 2